Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.230

State and local government bond information—Rules.

The department of commerce may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the administrative procedure act to require (1) the submission of bond issuance information by underwriters and bond counsel to the department of commerce in a timely manner and (2) the submission of additional information on bond issues by state and local governments, including summaries of outstanding bond issues.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2029; 1995 c 399 s 55; 1989 c 225 s 3; 1985 c 130 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.